Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202617-556
Public safety; firearms; explosives; riots; regulation.

Cities of the second class and villages shall have the power to (1) prevent and restrain riots, routs, noises, disturbances, or disorderly assemblages, (2) regulate, prevent, restrain, or remove nuisances and to designate what shall be considered a nuisance, (3) regulate, punish, and prevent the discharge of firearms, rockets, powder, fireworks, or any other dangerous combustible material in the streets, lots, grounds, alleys, or about or in the vicinity of any buildings, and (4) arrest, regulate, punish, or fine all vagrants.

Laws 1879, § 69, XXV, p. 216;

Laws 1881, c. 23, § 8, XXV, p. 184;

Laws 1885, c. 20, § 1, XXV, p. 175;

Laws 1887, c. 12, § 1, XXV, p. 303;

R.S.1913, § 5130;

C.S.1922, § 4305;

C.S.1929, § 17-454;

R.S.1943, § 17-556;

Laws 2009, LB430, § 4;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 180;

Laws 2023, LB77, § 5.

Cited but not discussed. City of Syracuse v. Farmers Elevator, Inc., 182 Neb. 783, 157 N.W.2d 394 (1968).

Power to "designate" what may be a public nuisance does not give a municipality the right to prohibit house-to-house solicitation of sales of merchandise. Jewel Tea Company v. City of Geneva, 137 Neb. 768, 291 N.W. 664 (1940).